Hawaii statutes.
§328L-3 Emergency and budget reserve fund.
(a) There is established in the state treasury the emergency and budget
reserve fund which shall be a special fund administered by the director of
finance, into which shall be deposited:

(1) Twenty-four and one-half per cent of the moneys received
from the tobacco settlement moneys under section 328L-2(b)(1);

(2) Appropriations made by the legislature to the
fund; and

(3) Five per cent of the state general fund balance
at the close of the fiscal year, whenever state general fund revenues for each
of two successive fiscal years exceeds revenues for each of the preceding
fiscal years by five per cent, pursuant to article VII, section 6 of the Hawaii
constitution. For the purpose of this section, the general fund balance at the
close of the fiscal year shall be calculated before any tax refund or tax
credit is authorized by the legislature, pursuant to article VII, section 6 of
the Hawaii constitution, that is provided during the same regular session as
the transfer depositing such moneys to the emergency and budget reserve fund;
provided that transfers shall not be made to the emergency and budget reserve
fund whenever the balance of the emergency and budget reserve fund is equal to
or more than ten per cent of general fund revenues for the preceding fiscal
year. The transfer shall be executed by the director of finance;

provided that all moneys deposited into the
emergency and budget reserve fund under paragraphs (1) and (2) and all moneys
deposited under paragraph (3) shall be kept in separate and distinct accounts.

(b) All interest earned from moneys in the
emergency and budget reserve fund shall be credited to the emergency and budget
reserve fund.

(c) Expenditures from the emergency and budget
reserve fund shall be a temporary supplemental source of funding for the State
during times of emergency, severe economic downturn, or unforeseen reduction in
revenues. No expenditures shall be made from the emergency and budget reserve
fund except pursuant to appropriations. The general appropriations bill or the
supplemental appropriations bill, as defined in section 9 of article VII of the
Hawaii constitution, shall not be used to appropriate moneys from the emergency
and budget reserve fund. The governor, through an appropriations bill, may
recommend expenditures from the emergency and budget reserve fund by setting
forth the purposes of the expenditures consistent with subsection (d), the
amounts, and the reasons justifying the necessity for the appropriations.

(d) The legislature may make appropriations
from the fund for the following purposes:

(1) To maintain levels of programs determined to be
essential to public health, safety, welfare, and education;

(2) To provide for counter cyclical economic and employment
programs in periods of economic downturn;

(3) To restore facilities destroyed or damaged or
services disrupted by disaster in any county; and

(4) To meet other emergencies when declared by the
governor or determined to be urgent by the legislature.

Any act making appropriations from the
emergency and budget reserve fund shall include a declaration of findings and
purposes setting forth the purposes, the amounts, and the reasons why the
appropriations are necessary and shall require a two-thirds majority vote of
each house of the legislature.

(e) Appropriations for the following purposes
from the emergency and budget reserve fund are specifically prohibited:

(1) To meet expenses of the legislature;

(2) To provide for salary adjustments for officials
appointed pursuant to article V, section 6 or article VI, section 3 of the
Constitution of the State of Hawaii and for others whose salaries are directly
related to salaries of these officials; and

(3) To fund cost items in any collective bargaining
contract. [L 1999, c 304, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 16, §24 and c 178, §§3, 6; am
L 2009, c 119, §6; am L 2010, c 138, §§1, 2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next